Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1408
Joint authority; executive committee; creation; exercise powers of board.

The board of directors of a joint authority may create an executive committee the composition of which shall be set forth in the bylaws of the joint authority. The executive committee shall have and shall exercise the powers and authority of the board of directors during intervals between the board's meetings in accordance with the board's bylaws, rules, motions, or resolutions. The terms of office of the members of the executive committee and the method of filling vacancies shall be fixed by the bylaws of the joint authority.

Laws 1982, LB 852, § 8.